Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF762.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168B.011, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Crime victim's vehicle. new text end new text begin "Crime victim's vehicle" means a motor vehicle that: new text end new text begin (1) has been reported as stolen by the owner of the vehicle; new text end new text begin (2) a law enforcement official has probable cause to believe constitutes or contains evidence of a crime and the law enforcement official knows or reasonably should know that the vehicle had been taken from the owner's possession or was being used without the owner's permission; or new text end new text begin (3) has been involved in a collision or accident caused by another driver operating a vehicle in violation of section 169.13, 169A.20, 609.2112, 609.2113, 609.2114, or 609.487, subdivision 3 or 4. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168B.051, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Crime victim's vehicle; sale after 180 days or title transfer. new text end new text begin (a) A crime victim's vehicle is eligible for disposal or sale under section 168B.08, the earlier of: new text end new text begin (1) 180 days after notice to the owner; or new text end new text begin (2) the date of a voluntary written title transfer by the registered owner to the impound lot operator. new text end new text begin (b) A voluntary written title transfer constitutes a waiver by the registered owner of any right, title, and interest in the vehicle. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to vehicles impounded on or after that date. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168B.06, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Written notice of impound. (a) When an impounded vehicle is taken into custody, the unit of government or impound lot operator taking it into custody shall give written notice of the taking within five days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, to the registered vehicle owner and any lienholders. (b) The notice must: (1) set forth the date and place of the taking; (2) provide the year, make, model, and serial number of the impounded motor vehicle, if such information can be reasonably obtained, and the place where the vehicle is being held; (3) inform the owner and any lienholders of their right to reclaim the vehicle under section 168B.07; (4) state thatnew text begin , unless the vehicle is a crime victim's vehicle,new text end failure of the owner or lienholders to: (i) exercise their right to reclaim the vehicle within the appropriate time allowed under section 168B.051, subdivision 1, 1a, or 2, and under the conditions set forth in section 168B.07, subdivision 1, constitutes a waiver by them of all right, title, and interest in the vehicle and a consent to the transfer of title to and disposal or sale of the vehicle pursuant to section 168B.08; or (ii) exercise their right to reclaim the contents of the vehicle within the appropriate time allowed and under the conditions set forth in section 168B.07, subdivision 3, constitutes a waiver by them of all right, title, and interest in the contents and consent to sell or dispose of the contents under section 168B.08; deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin (5) state that, if the vehicle is a crime victim's vehicle, the owner may reclaim the vehicle within 180 days without payment of any fee; and new text end deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end state that a vehicle owner who provides to the impound lot operator documentation from a government or nonprofit agency or legal aid office that the owner is homeless, receives relief based on need, or is eligible for legal aid services, has the unencumbered right to retrieve any and all contents without charge. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to vehicles impounded on or after that date. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168B.06, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Crime victim's vehicle; third notice. new text end new text begin If an unauthorized vehicle that is a crime victim's vehicle remains unclaimed after 60 days from the date the notice was sent under subdivision 3, a third notice must be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the registered owner, if any, of the unauthorized vehicle and to all readily identifiable lienholders of record. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to vehicles impounded on or after that date. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168B.07, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Crime victim's vehicle; charges prohibited for 180 days. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the registered owner of an impounded crime victim's vehicle shall have a right to reclaim such vehicle from the unit of government or impound lot operator taking it into custody within 180 days without payment of towing or storage charges. If the registered owner reclaims an impounded vehicle after 180 days, the unit of government or impound lot operator may require payment of reasonable towing and storage charges before releasing the vehicle. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to vehicles impounded on or after that date. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168B.08, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Unauthorized sale of crime victim's vehicle; reimbursement. new text end new text begin If a crime victim's vehicle is disposed of or sold at auction or sale before the vehicle is eligible for disposal or sale, the unit of government responsible for taking the vehicle into custody must reimburse the owner of the vehicle in an amount equal to the greater of the fair market value of the vehicle or 110 percent of the proceeds derived from a sale conducted under this section. The owner must claim reimbursement within two years of the disposal or sale. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to vehicles impounded on or after that date. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.042, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Fees and fines prohibited. new text end new text begin The victim of a vehicle theft or the owner of a vehicle that was stolen shall not be required to pay any fine as a result of the vehicle theft and shall not be required to pay any fees for the towing, impoundment, or other storage of the stolen motor vehicle. Any fees for the towing, impoundment, or other storage of the stolen motor vehicle shall be assessed against any person convicted of the theft of the vehicle. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to vehicle thefts committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin [611A.025] FINES OR FEES PROHIBITED. new text end new text begin A victim shall not be required to pay any fine or fee for any services performed by a unit of government or law enforcement agency as a result of a crime, including but not limited to towing, impoundment, or storage fees related to the recovery of a stolen vehicle, unless the victim is convicted of a related offense. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 611A.675, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Grants authorized. The commissioner of public safety shall make grants to prosecutors and victim assistance programs for the purpose of providing emergency assistance to victims. As used in this section, "emergency assistance" includes but is not limited to: (1) replacement of necessary property that was lost, damaged, or stolen as a result of the crime; (2) purchase and installation of necessary home security devices; (3) transportation to locations related to the victim's needs as a victim, such as medical facilities and facilities of the criminal justice system; (4) cleanup of the crime scene;new text begin andnew text end (5) reimbursement for reasonable travel and living expenses the victim incurred to attend court proceedings that were held at a location other than the place where the crime occurred due to a change of venuedeleted text begin ; anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (6) reimbursement of towing and storage fees incurred due to impoundment of a recovered stolen vehicle. deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin [626.745] MOTOR VEHICLE THEFT; INVESTIGATION AND NOTICE. new text end new text begin A law enforcement agency that receives a report that a motor vehicle has been taken from the owner's possession or is being used without the owner's permission must investigate the report. The law enforcement agency must provide the motor vehicle's owner with an update on the status of the investigation within 60 days of the report and must provide the notice required under section 169.042. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to thefts reported on or after that date. new text end